Maine, session 132, LD628.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 20-A MRSA §257-A, sub-§1-A, as amended by PL 2023, c. 171, §1, is
further amended to read:
1-A. Eligibility for students impacted by COVID-19 pandemic. Notwithstanding
the eligibility requirements in subsection 1, a student is eligible to apply for a Department
of Education diploma if that student is a 4th year secondary school student and is unable to
satisfy the requirements for a diploma from a school administrative unit because the student
experienced a significant interruption to the student's education as a result of the COVID‑19
pandemic and civil emergency during the student's secondary school education history.
This subsection is repealed on September 1, 2026.
Sec. 2. 20-A MRSA §257-A, sub-§1-C is enacted to read:
1-C. Exception for disruption to student's education conditions. A student is
eligible to apply for a Department of Education diploma if that student is at least a 4th year
secondary school student and is unable to satisfy the requirements for a diploma from a
school administrative unit because of a disruption to the student's education during the
student's secondary school education history. A disruption to the student's education may
include, but is not limited to, conditions described in section 5161, subsection 2-A.
Sec. 3. 20-A MRSA §5161, sub-§2-A, as amended by PL 2021, c. 445, §3, is
further amended to read:
2-A. Education disruption. "Education disruption" means disruption of the
educational program of an elementary or secondary school student as a result of:
A. Homelessness or, foster care placement or another housing disruption;
B. Absence for 10 or more consecutive school days due to placement in an interim
program more than 10% of the school days in a school year due to unforeseen
circumstances, including, but not limited to, placement in an interim program,
unplanned hospitalization or serious medical condition;
Page 1 - 132LR0910(03)

C. Enrollment in 3 2 or more schools or educational programs in a single school year
during the student's secondary school education; or
D. The student's being an immigrant student or a migrant student.
"Education disruption" does not include an absence for 10 or more consecutive school days
as a result of a planned absence for a reason such as a family event or a medical absence
for a planned hospitalization or recovery or pursuant to a superintendent's determination
developed in accordance with section 5205, subsection 2.
Page 2 - 132LR0910(03)